Utah statutes.
73-3-19.   Right of entry on private property -- By applicant -- Bond --
Priority.
Whenever any applicant for the use of water from any stream or water source
must necessarily enter upon private property in order to make a survey to
secure the required information for making a water filing and is refused by
the owner or possessor of such property such right of entry, he may petition
the district court for an order granting such right, and after notice and
hearing, such court may grant such permission, on security being given to pay
all damage caused thereby to the owner of such property. In such case the
priority of such application shall date from the filing of such petition with
the district court as aforesaid.
